Ohio, session 136, SB401.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.63 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.63. The eighth day of February is designated as "General William Tecumseh Sherman Day" in recognition of William Tecumseh Sherman, the civil war general who was born in Lancaster, Ohio on that day in 1820.